Tennessee, session 114, HB1035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The General and Public Laws of the State of Tennessee, to the extent
HB1035
000933
- 1 -

incorporated herein, on revisal shall be a part of Tennessee Code Annotated as follows, to wit:
(Contents of bill attached)
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000933